Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
CHAPTER 154A State Lottery

154A.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Amateur athletics” means any interscholastic athletics in which the participating athletes are elementary or secondary school students of any public or private institution of learning; any intercollegiate athletics in which the participating athletes are students of any public or private institution of higher education; or any athletics sponsored or regulated by the following amateur athletic associations including, but not limited to:

United States Olympic Committee;

National Collegiate Athletic Association;

National Association of Intercollegiate Athletics;

Kentucky High School Athletic Association;

Kentucky Amateur Athletics Union;

Bluegrass State Games;

Little League Baseball;

Amateur Softball Association;

Babe Ruth Leagues of Kentucky;

American Legion Baseball;

Kentucky Youth Soccer Association; or

Kentucky Special Olympics;

“Corporation” means the Kentucky Lottery Corporation;

“Lottery” means any game of chance approved by the corporation and operated pursuant to this chapter, except for games prohibited by the General Assembly as provided for in KRS 154A.063;

“Major lottery-specific procurement” means any gaming product or service including, but not limited to, major advertising contracts, annuity contracts, prize payment agreements, consulting services, personal service contracts, equipment, tickets, and all other products and services unique to the operation of the corporation in its lottery activities, but not including materials, supplies, equipment, and services common to the ordinary operations of a corporation;

“President” means the president of the Kentucky Lottery Corporation who shall also serve as chief executive officer of the corporation;

With respect to an individual, “related entity” means any spouse, child, brother, sister, or parent residing as a member of the same household in the principal place of abode of the individual, and any entity with respect to which the individual, or spouse, child, brother, sister, or parent of the individual has a financial interest of five percent (5%) or more, or is an officer, director, employee, or partner; and
(6) (a)

With respect to an individual, “related entity” means any spouse, child, brother, sister, or parent residing as a member of the same household in the principal place of abode of the individual, and any entity with respect to which the individual, or spouse, child, brother, sister, or parent of the individual has a financial interest of five percent (5%) or more, or is an officer, director, employee, or partner; and

With respect to any partnership, corporation, joint venture, or other entity, “related entity” means any officer, director, employee, partner, or owner of a financial interest of five percent (5%) or more of the total value thereof; any parent, subsidiary, or brother corporation; and any other entity with which the given entity has an identity of ownership of fifty percent (50%) or more.

“Retailer” means any person with whom the corporation has contracted to sell lottery tickets to the public;

“Security” means the protection of information that would provide an unfair advantage to any individual or other entity involved or seeking involvement in the operation of the lottery or the supply of major lottery-specific procurement items to the corporation, and the protection of:

Information that relates to detection or deterrence of, or could assist in the perpetration of, crimes against the corporation or its retailers, their locations, or their employees; or

Information which could impair or adversely impact the ability of the corporation or its retailers to protect the integrity of the lottery or protect lottery equipment, supplies, or proceeds;

“Sports contest” means any professional or amateur sport, athletic game or contest, or race or contest involving machines, persons, or animals, except horses, that is viewed by the public; and

“Vendor” means any person who has entered into a major lottery-specific procurement contract with the corporation.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1, effective December 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 470, § 74, effective July 1, 1990; 1994, ch. 170, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

154A.020.
State lottery created — Administration by corporation — Management — Intent of General Assembly — Senate confirmation required for corporation existence.

There is hereby created and established a state lottery which shall be administered by an independent, de jure municipal corporation and political subdivision of the Commonwealth of Kentucky which shall be a public body corporate and politic to be known as the Kentucky Lottery Corporation. The corporation shall be deemed a public agency within the meaning of KRS 61.805 and 61.870. This corporation shall be managed in such a manner that enables the people of the Commonwealth to benefit from its profits and to enjoy the best possible lottery games. The General Assembly hereby recognizes that the operations of a lottery are unique activities for state government and that a corporate structure will best enable the lottery to be managed in an entrepreneurial and business-like manner. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Kentucky Lottery Corporation shall be accountable to the Governor, the General Assembly and the people of the Commonwealth through a system of audits, reports and thorough financial disclosure as required by this chapter.

The existence of the corporation shall begin only upon confirmation of the members of the board by the Senate as provided in KRS 154A.030. Until the time of such confirmation, no business shall be conducted on behalf of the lottery.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no official action of any form shall be taken by the board at any time unless a majority of the members of the board shall have been confirmed by the Senate as provided in KRS 154A.030. Any action taken on behalf of the lottery when less than a majority of the members of the board shall have been confirmed shall be of no effect.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 2, effective December 15, 1988; 2014, ch. 102, § 33, effective July 15, 2014.

154A.030.
Board of directors — Senate confirmation — Qualifications — Terms — Removal — Chairman — Standards of conduct — Compensation — Meetings — Quorum — Records — Appointment and confirmation of corporation president — Duties — Removal — Open board meetings.

The affairs of the corporation shall be administered by a board of directors composed of eight (8) members. One (1) member of the board shall be the State Treasurer, who shall serve on the board in an ex officio capacity. The other seven (7) members shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to the advice and consent of the Senate. Members appointed when the Senate is not in session shall serve only until the next regular session, or special session if such matter is included in the call therefor of the General Assembly, at which time they shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate. If the Senate is not in session, the appointments shall be subject to review by the Interim Joint Committee on State Government which shall hold a public hearing and shall transmit its recommendations to the Senate. Should the Senate refuse to confirm a member then he shall forfeit his office as of the date on which the Senate refuses to confirm him. Any person not confirmed by the Senate shall not be reappointed as a member for a period of two (2) years. Members appointed by the Governor, and confirmed by the Senate, shall be residents of the Commonwealth of Kentucky and serve a term of four (4) years, except that of the initial members appointed, two (2) shall be appointed for one (1) year with the term ending on the twenty-eighth (28th) day of November, 1989; two (2) shall be appointed for two (2) years with the term ending on the twenty-eighth (28th) day of November, 1990; two (2) shall be appointed for three (3) years with the term ending on the twenty-eighth (28th) day of November, 1991; and one (1) shall be appointed for four (4) years with the term ending on the twenty-eighth (28th) day of November, 1992. Members, confirmed by the Senate, may serve thirty (30) days beyond the end of their respective terms if their successors have not been appointed and qualified. If the Governor fails to appoint a successor within thirty (30) days of expiration of a member’s term, the board shall make the appointment. No appointed member shall serve more than two (2) consecutive four-year terms. No more than four (4) of the members appointed by the Governor shall be from the same political party. Appointed members may be removed by the Governor for neglect of duty, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office. The board shall annually elect a chairman from among its appointed members.

No member of the board of directors, by himself or through others, shall knowingly:
(2) (a)

No member of the board of directors, by himself or through others, shall knowingly:

Use or attempt to use his influence in any manner which involves a substantial conflict between his personal or private interest and his duties to the corporation;

Use or attempt to use any means to influence the corporation in derogation of the corporation;

Use his official position or office to obtain financial gain for himself, or any spouse, parent, brother, sister, or child of the director; or

Use or attempt to use his official position to secure or create privileges, exemptions, advantages, or treatment for himself or others in derogation of the interests of the corporation or of the Commonwealth.

No director shall appear before the board or the corporation in any manner other than as a director.

A director shall abstain from action on an official decision in which he has or may have a personal or private interest, and shall disclose the existence of that personal or private interest in writing to each other member of the board on the same day on which the director becomes aware that the interest exists or that an official decision may be under consideration by the board. This disclosure shall cause the decision on these matters to be made in a meeting of the members of the board who do not have the conflict from which meeting the director shall be absent and from all votes on which matters the director shall abstain.

In determining whether to abstain from action on an official decision because of a possible conflict of interest, a director shall consider the following guidelines:

Whether a substantial threat to his independence of judgment has been created by his personal or private interest;

The effect of his participation on public confidence in the integrity of the corporation and the lottery;

Whether his participation is likely to have any significant effect on the disposition of the matter;

The need for his particular contribution, such as special knowledge of the subject matter, to the effective functioning of the corporation; and

Whether the official decision will affect him in a manner differently from the public, or will affect him as a member of a business, profession, occupation, or group to no greater extent generally than other members of his business, profession, occupation, or group.

No director, in order to further his own economic interests, or those of any person, shall knowingly disclose or use confidential information acquired in the course of his official duties.

No director shall knowingly receive, directly or indirectly, any interest or profit arising from the use or loan of lottery funds or funds to be raised through the lottery.

No director shall knowingly accept compensation, other than that provided in this section for directors, for performance of his official duties.

No present or former director shall, within one (1) year following termination of his membership on the board, accept employment, compensation, or other economic benefit from any person or business that contracts or does business with the corporation in matters in which he was directly involved during his tenure. This provision shall not prohibit an individual from continuing in the same business, firm, occupation, or profession in which he was involved prior to becoming a director, provided that, for a period of one (1) year following termination of his position as a director, he personally refrains from working on any matter in which he was directly involved as a director.

No director, and no spouse, child, brother, sister, or parent of that director shall have a financial interest of more than five percent (5%) of the total value of any vendor, other supplier of goods or services to the corporation, retailer, or related entity. The corporation shall provide each member of the board with a list of all current vendors, which shall be updated on at least a quarterly basis.

Appointed members of the board of directors shall be entitled to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per year as remuneration for serving on the board, except for the chairman, who shall receive seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500), and all members shall be reimbursed for necessary travel and other reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties.

The board, upon call of the chairman or the president, shall meet at least monthly for the first eighteen (18) months and bimonthly thereafter and at such other times as the chairman or the president may determine. Four (4) members of the board shall constitute a quorum. The board shall also meet upon call of three (3) or more of the voting members of the board. The board shall keep accurate and complete records of all its meetings.

The State Treasurer shall not be compensated for his service on the board.

The president of the corporation shall be appointed by the Governor subject to confirmation by the board of directors. Should the board of directors refuse to confirm the appointment of the president, then the Governor shall submit another name. The person whose appointment was refused shall not be renamed for confirmation for a period of two (2) years. The board of directors shall meet within thirty (30) days of the date the Governor submits the name of a nominee for president of the corporation and shall, within that time frame, either approve or reject the nomination. The president of the corporation shall manage the daily affairs of the corporation and shall have such powers and duties as specified by KRS 154A.070 and by the board of directors. The president shall not be a member of the board. The president of the corporation may be removed by the board of directors.

All meetings of the board shall be open unless they may be closed under KRS 61.810 or relate to trade secrets, legally-protectable intellectual property, confidential proprietary information, the security of the corporation in the operation of the lottery, or the security of the lottery’s retailers.

Any director may request a vote of the disinterested members of the board on whether any director shall abstain from action on an official decision.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.) ch. 1, § 3, effective December 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 170, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

154A.040.
Records of corporation deemed open — Exceptions — Circuit Court jurisdiction of records.

All records of the corporation shall be deemed open records and subject to public inspection, unless:

The record is excluded from inspection under KRS 61.870 to 61.884 under KRS 61.878;

The record involves a trade secret or other legally-protectable intellectual property or confidential proprietary information of the corporation or of a vendor; or

The disclosure of the record could impair or adversely impact the security of the corporation in the operation of the lottery or the security of lottery retailers.

The provisions of KRS 61.878, 61.880, and 61.884 shall apply to records of the lottery corporation with the exception that the only Circuit Court with jurisdiction over the records of the lottery corporation is the Circuit Court in the county where the corporate headquarters of the lottery corporation is located.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 4, effective December 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 170, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.

154A.050.
Duties of board.

The board of directors shall provide the president with private-sector perspectives on the operation of a large marketing enterprise. The board shall:

Approve, disapprove, amend, or modify the budget recommended by the president for the operation of the corporation;

Approve, disapprove, amend, or modify the terms of major lottery procurements recommended by the president;

Serve as a board of appeal for any denial, revocation, or cancellation by the president of a contract with a lottery retailer; and

Adopt, from time to time, administrative regulations which shall be subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A, as may be necessary to carry out and implement its powers and duties, the operation of the corporation, the conduct of lottery games in general, and any other matters necessary or desirable for the efficient and effective operation of the lottery or convenience of the public. The board may adopt, without recourse to the administrative regulation process unless it so desires, rules for the conduct of specific lottery games, including but not limited to, rules specifying:

The types of games to be conducted;

The sale price of tickets;

The number and amount of prizes;

The method and location of selecting or validating winning tickets;

The frequency and the means of conducting drawings which shall be open to the public;

The manner of payment of prizes;

The frequency of games and drawings;

The manner and amount of compensation to lottery retailers, except all compensation shall be uniform; and

Any other matters necessary or desirable for the efficient and effective operation of the lottery or for the convenience of the public.

In all other matters, the board shall advise and make recommendations. However, the board shall:

Conduct hearings upon complaints charging violations of this chapter or of administrative regulations adopted by the corporation and shall conduct such other hearings as may be provided by administrative regulation;

Review the performance of the corporation and:

Advise the president and make recommendations to him regarding operations of the corporation; and

Identify potential improvements in this chapter, the administrative regulations of the corporation, and the management of the corporation;

Request from the corporation any information the board determines to be relevant to its duties; and

Report to the president of the corporation, the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives regarding its findings and recommendations.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.) ch. 1, § 5, effective December 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 470, § 77, effective July 1, 1990; 1994, ch. 486, § 25, effective July 15, 1994.

154A.060.
Conduct and administration of lottery games — Powers and duties of corporation — Authorized contracts — Withholding lottery prize money for child support arrearages and default on higher education loans.

The corporation shall conduct and administer lottery games which will result in maximization of revenues to the Commonwealth of Kentucky while at the same time provide entertainment to its citizens. It shall be the duty of the corporation, its employees, and the members of the board to provide for the effective operation of lottery games which insure the integrity of the lottery and maintain the dignity of the Commonwealth and the general welfare of its citizens. The corporation, in pursuit of the attainment of the objectives and the purposes of this chapter, may:

Sue and be sued in its corporate name;

Adopt a corporate seal and a symbol;

Hold copyrights, trademarks, and service marks, and enforce its rights with respect thereto;

Appoint agents upon which process may be served;

Enter into written agreements with one (1) or more other states for the operation, marketing, and promotion of a joint lottery or joint lottery games;

Acquire real property and make improvements thereon. These acquisitions shall be reported to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee for its review and determination in accordance with KRS 45.750 to 45.810; and

Make, execute, and effectuate any and all agreements or contracts including:

Contracts for the purchase of such goods and services as are necessary for the operation and promotion of the state lottery. Proposed purchases of major items of equipment estimated to cost one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more and proposed purchases of items of equipment where the estimated contract price for all the items of equipment taken together is four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) or more shall be reported to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee for its review and determination in accordance with the provisions of KRS 45.750 to 45.810. A contract shall not be artificially divided to cause an estimated contract price to fall below the four hundred thousand dollar ($400,000) threshold. Contracts for personal service shall be reviewed in accordance with KRS 45A.690 to 45A.725.

Contracts to incur debt in its own name and enter into financing agreements with the Commonwealth, its own agencies, or with a commercial bank, excluding the authority to issue bonds.

The corporation shall:

Supervise and administer the lottery in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the administrative regulations adopted by the board;

Submit monthly and annual reports to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives containing financial statements which include but are not limited to disclosure of gross revenues, expenses, and net proceeds for the period;

Adopt by administrative regulation a system of continuous internal audits;

Maintain weekly or more frequent records of lottery transactions, including distribution of tickets to lottery retailers, revenues received, claims for prizes, prizes paid, and all other financial transactions of the corporation;

Adopt by administrative regulation a code of ethics for officers and employees of the corporation to carry out the standards of conduct established by the provisions of this chapter;

Include capital projects, as defined in KRS 45.750(1)(f), which exceed the thresholds set forth in KRS 154A.060(1)(g)1. in the budget unit request submitted by the corporation to the Finance and Administration Cabinet pursuant to KRS 48.050. In the budget unit request submitted by the corporation, a contingency item for acquisition of the on-line central system, all related equipment, and any other equipment owned by vendors of the corporation relating to computer-generated lottery games from the corporation’s vendors shall be stated separately from all other equipment. Further, if the identification of specific projects requiring the acquisition of equipment in the nature of computer systems, communications equipment and related peripheral devices, and operating system software cannot be ascertained with absolute certainty at the time the corporation is required to submit its budget unit request, the corporation shall be entitled to submit a general request for the equipment without individually identifying specific projects, together with a maximum amount to be allocated for the equipment, in the budget unit request;

The Kentucky Lottery Corporation and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall develop a system to allow the Kentucky Lottery Corporation to receive a list of delinquent child support obligors from the Cabinet for Health and Family Services on a monthly basis. The Kentucky Lottery Corporation shall withhold delinquent amounts from prizes of winners that appear on the list. This system shall be timely and shall not create an unavoidable delay in the payment of a lottery prize; and

The Kentucky Lottery Corporation and the authority shall develop a system to allow the Kentucky Lottery Corporation to receive on a periodic basis a list of persons declared in default of repayment obligations under financial assistance programs in KRS Chapters 164 and 164A. The Kentucky Lottery Corporation shall withhold from a person’s prize winnings the amount of the defaulted loan and shall transfer the amount to the authority to credit the account of the person in default. Any amount remaining after the deduction of the loan amount shall be paid to the person.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 6, effective December 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 496, § 45, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 507, § 22, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 31, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 486, § 26, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 77, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 430, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 236, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 99, § 126, effective June 20, 2005.

154A.063.
Prohibited lottery games.

The corporation shall not utilize amateur athletics for any purpose including, but not limited to, advertising, promoting, conducting a lottery, or as a basis for a lottery.

The corporation shall not approve and operate any casino or similar gambling establishment and shall not approve or operate any game played with playing cards, dice, dominos, slot machines, roulette wheels, or where winners are determined by the outcome of a sports contest.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit the corporation from advertising the lottery at, during, or in connection with a sports contest.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 470, § 75, effective July 1, 1990.

154A.065.
Contests involving horses may be basis for a lottery.

The corporation may utilize horse racing or contests involving horses for any purpose including, but not limited to, advertising, promoting, conducting a lottery, or as a basis for a lottery, after obtaining the necessary permission from the horse racing track or sponsoring authority involved.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 470, § 76, effective July 1, 1990.

154A.070.
Powers and duties of corporation’s president.

The president, as chief executive officer of the corporation, shall direct and supervise all administrative and technical activities in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and with the administrative regulations adopted by the board. It shall be his duty to:

Supervise and administer the operation of the lottery games;

Employ and direct such personnel as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter and utilize such services, personnel, or facilities of the corporation as he may deem necessary. He may employ by personal service contract pursuant to KRS 45A.690 to 45A.725 and compensate such consultants and technical assistants as may be required to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The president may, by agreement, secure information and services as he may deem necessary from any department, agency, or unit of state government, and shall compensate such department, agency, or unit of state government for its services. Such agencies, departments, or units of state government shall cooperate with the corporation and provide such information and services as may be required by the corporation to assure the integrity of the lottery and the effective operation of the lottery games;

Contract in accordance with the administrative regulations of the corporation with persons to sell lottery tickets at retail. The president shall require a bond or bank letter of credit from lottery retailers in an amount provided by administrative regulations issued by the board;

Make available for inspection by the board or any member of the board, upon request, all books, records, files, and other information and documents of his office and to advise the board and recommend such administrative regulations and other matters he deems necessary and advisable to improve the operation and administration of the lottery;

Enter into any contract pursuant to KRS Chapters 45 and 45A or administrative regulations promulgated by the board, and pursuant to KRS 154A.120, with any person, firm, or corporation for the promotion and any operation of the lottery, or for the performance of any of the functions as provided in this chapter;

Attend meetings of the board or appoint a designee to attend on his behalf; and

On the first day of the Regular Session of the General Assembly in 1990 and biennially thereafter, submit the proposed biennial budget of the corporation to the Appropriations and Revenue Committee of the House of Representatives for review and comment. The budget shall be submitted to the Director of the Legislative Research Commission within five (5) days of adoption by the board for distribution to the Appropriations and Revenue Committee of the House of Representatives for review.

The president, with the approval of the board, may amend or modify the budget at any time in any manner deemed necessary for the proper operation of the corporation; however, each change shall be reported in writing to the board and to the director of the Legislative Research Commission, who shall transmit a copy of the change to the Appropriations and Revenue Committee of the House of Representatives.

Following his confirmation, and during his entire term of office, the president shall reside in Kentucky.

The president, and the board, may conduct an ongoing study of the operation and administration of lotteries in other states or countries, of available literature on the subject, of federal laws and regulations which may affect the operation of the lottery, and of the reaction of citizens of this state to existing or proposed features of lottery games, with a view toward implementing improvements that will tend to serve the purposes of this chapter.

The president also may:

Require bond from corporate employees with access to corporate funds or lottery funds, in such an amount as provided in the administrative regulations of the board. The president may also require bond from other employees as he deems necessary; and

For good cause, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew any contract entered into in accordance with the provisions of this chapter or the administrative regulations of the board.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 7, effective December 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 496, § 46, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 170, § 4, effective July 15, 1994.

154A.080.
Personnel program for employees — Conflict of interest provisions — Background investigations — Employment of specified persons by corporation prohibited.

The corporation shall establish and maintain a personnel program for its employees. The corporation may procure benefit programs or group insurance plans and shall provide a retirement plan. Employees of the corporation shall serve at the pleasure of the president who shall determine their compensation and benefits. The employees shall be subject to suspension, dismissal, reduction in pay, demotion, transfer, or other personnel action at the discretion of the president. Such personnel actions shall be exempt from the provisions of KRS Chapter 18A. The compensation of officers at the division head level and above shall be exempt from the provisions of KRS 64.640.

No officer or employee of the corporation shall have a financial interest in any vendor doing business or proposing to do business with the corporation.

No officer or employee of the corporation with decision-making authority shall participate in any decision involving a retailer with whom the officer or employee has a financial interest of five percent (5%) or more of the total value thereof.

No officer or employee of the corporation who leaves the employ of the corporation may represent any vendor, lottery retailer, or related entity before the corporation for a period of two (2) years following termination of employment with the corporation.

A background investigation shall be conducted by the chief security officer of the corporation on every applicant who has reached the final selection process prior to employment by the corporation. Applicants may be fingerprinted as a condition of employment. In addition, all division directors of the corporation and employees of the corporation performing duties primarily related to security matters, prior to employment, shall be subject to a background investigation report conducted by the Department of Kentucky State Police. The Department of Kentucky State Police shall be reimbursed by the corporation for the cost of investigations conducted pursuant to this section. No person who has been convicted of a felony, bookmaking or other forms of illegal gambling, or of a crime involving moral turpitude shall be employed by the corporation. Any employee of the corporation who is or has been convicted of a felony, bookmaking, or any other form of illegal gambling or of a crime involving moral turpitude shall be terminated from employment by the corporation, except that this requirement shall not be interpreted to limit the right of the corporation to terminate the employment of any employee, at will, prior to any conviction.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 8, effective December 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 170, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 85, § 162, effective June 26, 2007.

154A.090.
Appeals — Circuit Court alternatives.

Any retailer, vendor, or applicant for a retailer or vendor contract aggrieved by an action of the president of the corporation may appeal that decision to the board.

All appeals before the board shall be decided within thirty (30) days of the hearing.

Any person aggrieved by a decision of the board may appeal the decision to the Circuit Court of the county in which the corporation maintains its headquarters, except that if the person aggrieved is a lottery retailer or an applicant to become a lottery retailer, then the Circuit Court of the county in which said retailer does or applicant would operate shall have concurrent venue as to such appeal.

The Circuit Court may reverse the decision of the board only in the event the decision is found to be:

Clearly erroneous; or

Arbitrary and capricious; or

Procured by fraud; or

A result of misconduct by the board, or a member thereof.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 11, effective December 15, 1988.

154A.100.
Bond, letters of credit or other surety.

Whenever a bond is required for the protection of the corporation, letters of credit or other surety as may be approved by the corporation, may be utilized in lieu of a bond.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 12, effective December 15, 1988.